dictsource/pa_rules
// Punjabi Gurmukhi script
// This file is UTF8 encoded

// letter groups:
// A   vowel letters
// B   vowel signs and virama ्
// C   consonants
// Y   vowel letters and vowel signs



// Schwa kept or dropped: corrections learned from WikiPron on top of the
// phoneme table's own schwa deletion.
// The rule lines marked "// generated" in each consonant group are not
// hand-written: android/tools/schwa learns them (rule induction on 80% of
// the words) and writes them here.
// L20 = written vowels (signs, and independent vowels except ਅ);
// L21 = consonant letters; L22 = any Gurmukhi letter; L23 = ੰ ਂ.
.L20 ਾ ਿ ੀ ੁ ੂ ੃ ੄ ੅ ੆ ੇ ੈ ੉ ੊ ੋ ੌ ਆ ਇ ਈ ਉ ਊ ਋ ਌ ਍ ਎ ਏ ਐ ਑ ਒ ਓ ਔ
.L21 ਕ ਖ ਗ ਘ ਙ ਚ ਛ ਜ ਝ ਞ ਟ ਠ ਡ ਢ ਣ ਤ ਥ ਦ ਧ ਨ ਩ ਪ ਫ ਬ ਭ ਮ ਯ ਰ ਱ ਲ ਲ਼ ਴ ਵ ਸ਼ ਷ ਸ ਹ ਖ਼ ਗ਼ ਜ਼ ੜ ੝ ਫ਼ ਲ਼ ਸ਼
.L22 ਅ ਆ ਇ ਈ ਉ ਊ ਋ ਌ ਍ ਎ ਏ ਐ ਑ ਒ ਓ ਔ ਕ ਖ ਗ ਘ ਙ ਚ ਛ ਜ ਝ ਞ ਟ ਠ ਡ ਢ ਣ ਤ ਥ ਦ ਧ ਨ ਩ ਪ ਫ ਬ ਭ ਮ ਯ ਰ ਱ ਲ ਲ਼ ਴ ਵ ਸ਼ ਷ ਸ ਹ ਾ ਿ ੀ ੁ ੂ ੃ ੄ ੅ ੆ ੇ ੈ ੉ ੊ ੋ ੌ ਖ਼ ਗ਼ ਜ਼ ੜ ੝ ਫ਼ ੰ ਂ ਲ਼ ਸ਼
.L23 ੰ ਂ

.replace
 ੦	0
 ੧	1
 ੨	2
 ੩	3
 ੪	4
 ੫	5
 ੬	6
 ੭	7
 ੮	8
 ੯	9

 ૦	0
 ૧	1
 ૨	2
 ૩	3
 ૪	4
 ૫	5
 ૬	6
 ૭	7
 ૮	8
 ૯	9


// combine dot consonants into a single character
ਸ਼	ਸ਼
ਲ਼	ਲ਼	// l.
ਖ਼	ਖ਼	// x
ਗ਼	ਗ਼	// Q
ਜ਼	ਜ਼	// z
ਫ਼	ਫ਼	// f

// combine base vowel+vowel sign into single vowel characters
ਅੈ	ਐ	// aI
ਅਾ	ਆ	// aa
ਅੌ	ਔ	// aU
ੲੀ	ਈ	// ii
ੲਿ	ਇ	// i
ੲੇ	ਏ	// e
ੳੁ	ਉ	// u
ੳੂ	ਊ	// uu



// Vowels

.L01 ਾ ਿ ੀ ੁ ੂ ੇ ੈ ੋ ੌ ਂ ੰ   // vowel signs and nasal signs

.group ੳ
        ੳ          u

.group ੲ
        ੲ          i


.group ਅ
        ਅ          ,V
        ਅਂ         V~
        ਅੰ         V~

.group ਆ
        ਆ          a
        ਆਂ         a~
        ਆੰ         a~

.group ਇ
        ਇ          I
        ਇਂ         I~
        ਇੰ         I~

.group ਈ
        ਈ          i
        ਈਂ         i~
        ਈੰ         i~

.group ਉ
        ਉ          U
        ਉਂ         U~
        ਉੰ         U~

.group ਊ
        ਊ          u
        ਊਂ         u~
        ਊੰ         u~

.group ਏ
        ਏ          e
        ਏਂ         e~
        ਏੰ         e~

.group ਐ
        ਐ          E
        ਐਂ         E~
        ਐੰ         E~

.group ਓ
        ਓ          o
        ਓਂ         o~
        ਓੰ         o~

.group ਔ
        ਔ          O
        ਔਂ         O~
        ਔੰ         O~

.group ૠ
        ૠ          r-


// Vowel Signs

.group ਾ
ਾ	#X2kVnn'a
C)        ਾ          a
C)        ਾਂ         a~
C)        ਾੰ         a~

.group ਿ
ਿ	#X1sIh'aRi
C)        ਿ          I
C)        ਿਂ         I~
C)        ਿੰ         I~

.group ੀ
ੀ	#X2bIh'aRi
C)        ੀ          i
C)        ੀਂ         i~
C)        ੀੰ         i~

.group ੁ
ੁ	#X1OnkaR
C)        ੁ          U
C)        ੁਂ         U~
C)        ੁੰ         U~

.group ੂ
ੂ	#X2dUl'EnkaR
C)        ੂ          u
C)        ੂਂ         u~
C)        ੂੰ         u~

.group ੇ
ੇ	#X1l'ava~
C)        ੇ          e
C)        ੇਂ         e~
C)        ੇੰ         e~

.group ੈ
ੈ	#X2d@l'ava~
C)        ੈ          E         // aI
C)        ੈਂ         E~
C)        ੈੰ         E~

.group ੋ
ੋ	#X1hoR'a
C)        ੋ          o
C)        ੋਂ         o~
C)        ੋੰ         o~

.group ੌ
ੌ	#X2kVn'ORa
C)        ੌ          O         // aU
C)        ੌਂ         O~
C)        ੌੰ         O~


// Consonants ਕે

.group ਕ
        ਕ          kV        // inherent vowel
        ਕ (B       k         // no inherent vowel if vowel or virama follows
        ਕ (_       k         // omit inherent vowel at end of word
     ੱ) ਕ          k:V
     ੱ) ਕ (B       k:
     ੱ) ਕ (_       k:

.group ਖ
        ਖ          k#V
        ਖ (B       k#
        ਖ (_       k#
     ੱ) ਖ          k#:V
     ੱ) ਖ (B       k#:
     ੱ) ਖ (_       k#:

.group ਗ
        ਗ          gV
        ਗ (B       g
        ਗ (_       g
     ੱ) ਗ          g:V
     ੱ) ਗ (B       g:
     ੱ) ਗ (_       g:

.group ਘ
        ਘ          g#V
        ਘ (B       g#
        ਘ (_       g#
     _) ਘ          k+V       // high tone
     _) ਘ (B       k+

.group ਙ
        ਙ          NV
        ਙ (B       N
        ਙ (_       N
     ੱ) ਙ          N:V
     ੱ) ਙ (B       N:
     ੱ) ਙ (_       N:

.group ਚ
        ਚ          cV
        ਚ (B       c
        ਚ (_       c
     ੱ) ਚ          c:V
     ੱ) ਚ (B       c:
     ੱ) ਚ (_       c:

.group ਛ
        ਛ          c#V
        ਛ (B       c#
        ਛ (_       c#
     ੱ) ਛ          c#:V
     ੱ) ਛ (B       c#:
     ੱ) ਛ (_       c#:

.group ਜ
        ਜ          JV
        ਜ (B       J
        ਜ (_       J
     ੱ) ਜ          J:V
     ੱ) ਜ (B       J:
     ੱ) ਜ (_       J:

.group ਝ
        ਝ          J#V
        ਝ (B       J#
        ਝ (_       J#
     _) ਝ          c+V
     _) ਝ (B       c+

.group ਞ
        ਞ          n^V
        ਞ (B       n^
        ਞ (_       n^
     ੱ) ਞ          n^:V
     ੱ) ਞ (B       n^:
     ੱ) ਞ (_       n^:

.group ਟ
        ਟ          t.V
        ਟ (B       t.
        ਟ (_       t.
     ੱ) ਟ          t.:V
     ੱ) ਟ (B       t.:
     ੱ) ਟ (_       t.:

.group ਠ
        ਠ          t.#V
        ਠ (B       t.#
        ਠ (_       t.#
     ੱ) ਠ          t.#:V
     ੱ) ਠ (B       t.#:
     ੱ) ਠ (_       t.#:

.group ਡ
        ਡ          d.V
        ਡ (B       d.
        ਡ (_       d.
     ੱ) ਡ          d.:V
     ੱ) ਡ (B       d.:
     ੱ) ਡ (_       d.:

.group ਢ
        ਢ          d.#V
        ਢ (B       d.#
        ਢ (_       d.#
     _) ਢ          t.+V
     _) ਢ (B       t.

.group ਣ
        ਣ          n.V
        ਣ (B       n.
        ਣ (_       n.
     ੱ) ਣ          n.:V
     ੱ) ਣ (B       n.:
     ੱ) ਣ (_       n.:

.group ਤ
        ਤ          tV
        ਤ (B       t
        ਤ (_       t
     ੱ) ਤ          t:V
     ੱ) ਤ (B       t:
     ੱ) ਤ (_       t:

.group ਥ
        ਥ          t#V
        ਥ (B       t#
        ਥ (_       t#
     ੱ) ਥ          t#:V
     ੱ) ਥ (B       t#:
     ੱ) ਥ (_       t#:

.group ਦ
        ਦ          dV
        ਦ (B       d
        ਦ (_       d
     ੱ) ਦ          d:V
     ੱ) ਦ (B       d:
     ੱ) ਦ (_       d:

.group ਧ
        ਧ          d#V
        ਧ (B       d#
        ਧ (_       d#
     _) ਧ          t+V
     _) ਧ (B       t+

.group ਨ
        ਨ          nV
        ਨ (B       n
        ਨ (_       n
     ੱ) ਨ          n:V
     ੱ) ਨ (B       n:
     ੱ) ਨ (_       n:

.group ਪ
        ਪ          pV
        ਪ (B       p
        ਪ (_       p
     ੱ) ਪ          p:V
     ੱ) ਪ (B       p:
     ੱ) ਪ (_       p:

.group ਫ
        ਫ          p#V
        ਫ (B       p#
        ਫ (_       p#
     ੱ) ਫ          p#:V
     ੱ) ਫ (B       p#:
     ੱ) ਫ (_       p#:

.group ਬ
        ਬ          bV
        ਬ (B       b
        ਬ (_       b
     ੱ) ਬ          b:V
     ੱ) ਬ (B       b:
     ੱ) ਬ (_       b:

.group ਭ
        ਭ          b#V
        ਭ (B       b#
        ਭ (_       b#
     _) ਭ          p+V
     _) ਭ (B       p+

.group ਮ
        ਮ          mV
        ਮ (B       m
        ਮ (_       m
     ੱ) ਮ          m:V
     ੱ) ਮ (B       m:
     ੱ) ਮ (_       m:

.group ਯ
        ਯ          jV
        ਯ (B       j
        ਯ (_       j
     ੱ) ਯ          j:V
     ੱ) ਯ (B       j:
     ੱ) ਯ (_       j:

.group ਰ
        ਰ          rV
        ਰ (B       r
        ਰ (_       r
     ੱ) ਰ          r:V
     ੱ) ਰ (B       r:
     ੱ) ਰ (_       r:

.group ਲ
        ਲ          lV
        ਲ (B       l
        ਲ (_       l
     ੱ) ਲ          l:V
     ੱ) ਲ (B       l:
     ੱ) ਲ (_       l:

.group ਲ਼
        ਲ਼          l.V
        ਲ਼ (B       l.
        ਲ਼ (_       l.

.group ਵ
        ਵ          vV
        ਵ (B       v
        ਵ (_       v
     ੱ) ਵ          v:V
     ੱ) ਵ (B       v:
     ੱ) ਵ (_       v:

.group ਸ਼
        ਸ਼          SV
        ਸ਼ (B       S
        ਸ਼ (_       S
     ੱ) ਸ਼          S:V
     ੱ) ਸ਼ (B       S:
     ੱ) ਸ਼ (_       S:

.group ਸ
        ਸ          sV
        _L22) ਸ (L21L21_         s        // generated
        _L22) ਸ (L21L21          s        // generated
        _L22L22) ਸ (L21L21_      s        // generated
        _L22L22) ਸ (L21L21       s        // generated
        L22) ਸ (L21L21_          s        // generated
        L22) ਸ (L21L21           s        // generated
        ਸ (B       s
        ਸ (_       s
     ੱ) ਸ          s:V
     ੱ) ਸ (B       s:
     ੱ) ਸ (_       s:

.group ਹ
        ਹ          HV
        ਹ (B       H
        ਹ (_       H
// After a vowel, ਹ is a tone rather than an [h]: ਨੀਂਹ, ਸੋਹਣਾ, ਇਹਦਾ.
   L01) ਹ (_
     A) ਹ (_
   L01) ਹ (C
     A) ਹ (C

.group ਖ਼
        ਖ਼          xV
        ਖ਼ (B       x
        ਖ਼ (_       x

.group ਗ਼
        ਗ਼          QV
        ਗ਼ (B       Q
        ਗ਼ (_       Q

.group ਜ਼
        ਜ਼          zV
        ਜ਼ (B       z
        ਜ਼ (_       z

.group ੜ
        ੜ          r.V
        ੜ (B       r.
        ੜ (_       r.

.group ਫ਼
        ਫ਼          fV
        ਫ਼ (B       f
        ਫ਼ (_       f


.group ੍
੍	hVlVnt
C)	੍ 
	C) ੍ (C_	=

.group ਼
        ਼                    // nukta

.group ੱ
        ੱ                    // addak

.group ਂ
        ਂ (ਕ       N
        ਂ (ਖ       N
        ਂ (ਗ       N
        ਂ (ਘ       N
        ਂ (ਚ       n^
        ਂ (ਛ       n^
        ਂ (ਜ       n^
        ਂ (ਝ       n^
        ਂ (ਟ       n.
        ਂ (ਠ       n.
        ਂ (ਡ       n.
        ਂ (ਢ       n.
        ਂ (ਤ       n
        ਂ (ਥ       n
        ਂ (ਦ       n
        ਂ (ਧ       n
        ਂ (ਪ       m
        ਂ (ਫ       m
        ਂ (ਬ       m
        ਂ (ਭ       m
        ਂ          N         // bindi

.group ੰ
        ੰ (ਕ       N
        ੰ (ਖ       N
        ੰ (ਗ       N
        ੰ (ਘ       N
        ੰ (ਚ       n^
        ੰ (ਛ       n^
        ੰ (ਜ       n^
        ੰ (ਝ       n^
        ੰ (ਟ       n.
        ੰ (ਠ       n.
        ੰ (ਡ       n.
        ੰ (ਢ       n.
        ੰ (ਤ       n
        ੰ (ਥ       n
        ੰ (ਦ       n
        ੰ (ਧ       n
        ੰ (ਪ       m
        ੰ (ਫ       m
        ੰ (ਬ       m
        ੰ (ਭ       m
        ੰ          n         // tippi

.group ਃ
        ਃ          h

.group
        $          dOlVR     // TEST
        %          pVsEnt    // TEST
.group o
        o          _^_EN
   D__) of (__D     v'Ico~
